Washington statutes.
RCW 2.14.060

Judicial retirement principal account—Creation—Transfer of deficiencies—Contributions—Use.

The judicial retirement principal account is created in the state treasury. Any deficiency in the judicial retirement administrative account caused by an excess of administrative expenses disbursed from that account over earnings of investments of balances credited to that account shall be transferred to that account from the principal account.

The contributions under *section 19 of this act shall be paid into the principal account and shall be sufficient to cover costs of administration and staffing in addition to such other amounts as determined by the administrator for the courts. The principal account shall be used to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

[ 1988 c 109 s 17.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to section 19 of this act appears to be incorrect. Section 20 of the act, codified as RCW 2.14.090, was apparently intended.

Effective date—1988 c 109: See note following RCW 2.10.030.